Washington statutes.
RCW 36.81.080

Hearing—Road established by resolution.

On the day fixed for the hearing or any day to which the hearing has been adjourned, upon proof to its satisfaction made by affidavit of due publication and posting of the notice of hearing, the board shall consider the report and any and all evidence relative thereto, and if the board finds that the proposed county road is a public necessity and practicable it may establish it by proper resolution.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.81.080. Prior: 1937 c 187 s 22, part; RRS s 6450-22, part.]